src/pron-grn-lex.txt
! personal:
!! 	         first	            second	third
!! singular	che	                nde	    ha'e	
!! plural	ñande (inclusive),   peẽ	ha'ekuéra/ hikuái
!!          ore (exclusive)

LEXICON Pronoun 

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;

LEXICON Personal
K ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
K ;

LEXICON Reflexive
K ;
